Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.230

Metropolitan water advisory committee.

If a metropolitan municipal corporation shall be authorized to perform the function of metropolitan water supply, the metropolitan council shall, prior to the effective date of the assumption of such function, cause a metropolitan water advisory committee to be formed by notifying the legislative body of each component city which operates a water system to appoint one person to serve on such advisory committee and the board of commissioners of each water-sewer district that operates a water system, any portion of which lies within the metropolitan area, to appoint one person to serve on such committee who shall be a water-sewer district commissioner. The metropolitan water advisory committee shall meet at the time and place provided in the notice and elect a chair. The members of such committee shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing bodies and shall receive no compensation other than reimbursement for expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties. The function of such advisory committee shall be to advise the metropolitan council with respect to matters relating to the performance of the water supply function.

The requirement to create a metropolitan water advisory committee shall not apply to a county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2104; 1999 c 153 s 35; 1993 c 240 s 5; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.230. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 23.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.